Alabama, session 2026rs, SB13.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 40-21-83 and 40-21-103 of the Code
of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§40-21-83
Page 1

"§40-21-83
SB13 INTRODUCED
There are specifically excluded from the gross receipts
or gross sales of a utility, all revenues derived from any of
the following:
(1) The furnishing of utility services which the State
of Alabama is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution or
laws of the United States of America or the Constitution of
the State of Alabama of 2022.
(2) The furnishing of utility services which are
otherwise taxed under Sections 40-23-1 to 40-23-36, inclusive.
(3) Wholesale sales.
(4) The furnishing of electricity, natural gas, or
domestic water for use or consumption by, in, or for the
direct production, generation, processing, storage, delivery,
or transmission of electricity, natural gas, or domestic
water.
(5) The furnishing of electricity to a manufacturer or
compounder for use in an electrolytic or electrothermal
manufacturing or compounding process.
(6) The furnishing of natural gas to a manufacturer or
compounder as a chemical raw material in the manufacturing or
compounding of tangible personal property, but not as fuel or
energy.
(7) The furnishing of natural gas to be used by a
manufacturer or compounder to chemically convert raw materials
prior to the use of the converted raw materials in an
electrolytic or electrothermal manufacturing or compounding
process.
(8) The use or consumption of electricity by an
Page 2

(8) The use or consumption of electricity by an
SB13 INTRODUCED
incorporated municipality, a board, or corporation organized
under the authority of any incorporated municipality in
furnishing or providing street lighting or traffic-control
systems; the use or consumption of telephone services by an
incorporated municipality in providing fire alarm systems; and
the use or consumption of domestic water by an incorporated
municipality in extinguishing fires, explosions, or
conflagrations.
(9) The furnishing of natural gas, propane, or
electricity for use or consumption as fuel or energy in and
for the heating of poultry houses.
(10) The furnishing of utility services through the use
of a prepaid telephone calling card."
"§40-21-103
The storage, use, or other consumption of utility
services in the State of Alabama is hereby specifically
excluded from the tax herein levied:
(1) Whenever the State of Alabama is prohibited from
taxing such storage, use, or consumption under the
Constitution or laws of the United States of America or the
Constitution of the State of Alabama of 2022;
(2) Whenever any tax relating to the sale, use,
storage, or consumption of said utility services shall be
levied under the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 23 of this
title, or under the provisions of Sections 40-23-1 through
40-23-36 or the Alabama Transaction Tax Act of 1992 if enacted
into law;
(3) Whenever the purchase of said utility services
Page 3

(3) Whenever the purchase of said utility services
SB13 INTRODUCED
shall have been at a wholesale sale;
(4) Whenever electricity, natural gas, or domestic
water shall have been used or consumed directly in or for the
production, generation, processing, storage, delivery, or
transmission of electricity, natural gas, or domestic water;
(5) Whenever electricity purchased for storage, use, or
other consumption is used or consumed by a manufacturer or
compounder in an electrolytic or electrothermal manufacturing
or compounding process;
(6) Whenever natural gas purchased for storage, use, or
other consumption is used or consumed by a manufacturer or
compounder as a chemical raw material in the manufacturing or
compounding of tangible personal property, but not as fuel or
energy;
(7) Whenever natural gas purchased for storage, use, or
100 other consumption is used by a manufacturer or compounder to
101 chemically convert raw materials prior to the use of such
102 converted raw materials in an electrolytic or electrothermal
103 manufacturing or compounding process;
104 (8) Whenever the sales price of said utility services
105 shall be included as a part of the gross receipts or gross
106 sales of a utility subject to the utility gross receipts tax
107 for the purpose of calculating the utility gross receipts tax
108 payable by said utility;
109 (9) Whenever electricity purchased for storage, use, or
110 other consumption is used or consumed in a process for the
111 isotopic enrichment of uranium and when said electricity is
112 purchased from a subsidiary corporation of the corporation
Page 4

purchased from a subsidiary corporation of the corporation
SB13 INTRODUCED
113 engaged in the isotopic enrichment of uranium; and
114 (10) Whenever utility services are furnished through
115 the use of a prepaid telephone calling card; and
116 (11) Whenever natural gas, propane, or electricity
117 purchased for storage, use, or other consumption is used or
118 consumed as fuel or energy in poultry houses."
119 Section 2. This act shall become effective on
120 September 1, 2026.
Page 5